West Virginia, session 2025, HB2558.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. STATE ROAD SYSTEM. §17-4-8. Use of roadbed by railroad, telephone company, etc. No railroad or electric or other railway shall may be constructed or maintained upon the roadbed of any state road, except to cross the same, nor road except under such restrictions, conditions and regulations as may be prescribed by the Commissioner of the Division of Highways. nor Nor shall may any person, firm, or corporation enter upon or construct any works in or upon such a state road, or lay or maintain thereon or thereunder any drainage, sewer or water pipes, gas pipes, electric conduits or other pipes, nor shall may any telephone, telegraph or electric line or power pole, or any other structure whatsoever, be erected upon, in or over any portion of a state road, except under such restrictions, conditions and regulations as may be prescribed by the state Road Commissioner Commissioner of the Division of Highways. Whenever any railroad or electric or other railway, heretofore or hereafter constructed, shall cross crosses any state road, it shall be required to keep its own roadbed, and the bed of the road or highway at such the crossing, in proper repair, or else to construct and maintain an overhead or undergrade crossing, subject to the approval of the State Road Commissioner; and the Commissioner of the Division of Highways. The tracks of such a railroad or railway at grade crossings shall be so constructed as to give a safe and easy approach to and across the same, and when tracks. When the construction of such these approaches is made necessary by a change in the railroad grade at the grade crossing, the cost shall be upon the railway company.